Tennessee, session 114, HB0183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 13, Chapter 7, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A county legislative body shall approve an application for a proposed
development without allowing public comment, notwithstanding § 8-44-112, if the county
legislative body determines that the proposed development is in substantial compliance
with the zoning regulations or map that were previously made available for public review
and comment.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 13, Chapter 7, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A chief legislative body shall approve an application for a proposed development
without allowing public comment, notwithstanding § 8-44-112, if the chief legislative body
determines that the proposed development is in substantial compliance with the zoning
regulations or map that were previously made available for public review and comment.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to applications for approval submitted on or after such date.
HB0183
001568
- 1 -